North Dakota statutes. TITLE 8 Carriage
CHAPTER 8-08 Common Carriers of Persons

8-08-01.
Carrier may make rules.

A common carrier of persons may make rules for the conduct of the common carrier’s business and may require passengers to conform to them if they are lawful, public, uniform in their application, and reasonable.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1270; R.C. 1895, § 4238; R.C. 1899, § 4238; R.C. 1905, § 5686; C.L. 1913, § 6249; R.C. 1943, § 8-0801.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2186.

Cross-References.

Civil penalty for violation of statute, commission order or commission regulation, see § 49-07-01.1.

8-08-02.
Obligation to carry luggage.

A common carrier of persons, unless the common carrier’s vehicle is fitted for the reception of passengers exclusively, shall receive and carry a reasonable amount of luggage for each passenger without any charge.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1264; R.C. 1895, § 4232; R.C. 1899, § 4232; R.C. 1905, § 5680; C.L. 1913, § 6243; R.C. 1943, § 8-0802.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2180.

8-08-03.
Luggage — Carriage and delivery.

A common carrier shall deliver every passenger’s luggage immediately upon the arrival of the passenger at the passenger’s destination, and unless the vehicle would be overcrowded or overloaded thereby, shall carry it on the same vehicle by which the common carrier carries the passenger to whom it belongs.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1267; R.C. 1895, § 4235; R.C. 1899, § 4235; R.C. 1905, § 5683; C.L. 1913, § 6246; R.C. 1943, § 8-0803.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2183.

8-08-04.
Liability for luggage.

The liability of a carrier for luggage received by the carrier with a passenger is the same as that of a common carrier of property.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1266; R.C. 1895, § 4234; R.C. 1899, § 4234; R.C. 1905, § 5682; C.L. 1913, § 6245; R.C. 1943, § 8-0804.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2182.

Collateral References.

Tort liability of carrier for theft by servant, 15 A.L.R.2d 829, 846.

Liability of air carrier for loss of or damage to passenger’s baggage or contents thereof, 25 A.L.R.2d 1352.

Railroad carrier’s liability for loss of baggage or effects accompanying passenger, 32 A.L.R.2d 630.

Baggage: carrier’s liability for loss of passenger’s baggage or packages, 68 A.L.R.2d 1350.

8-08-05.
Carrier shall provide sufficient vehicles and seats.

A common carrier of persons shall provide a sufficient number of vehicles to accommodate all the passengers who can be reasonably expected to require carriage at any one time and shall provide every passenger with a seat. A common carrier of persons must not overload the common carrier’s vehicle by receiving and carrying more passengers than its rated capacity allows.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, §§ 1268, 1269; R.C. 1895, §§ 4236, 4237; R.C. 1899, §§ 4236, 4237; R.C. 1905, §§ 5684, 5685; C.L. 1913, §§ 6247, 6248; R.C. 1943, § 8-0805.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2184, 2185.

Cross-References.

Overcrowding prohibited, see § 8-02-04.

Collateral References.

Crowding: carrier’s liability to passenger for injury due to crowded condition of bus, or pushing or crowding of passengers therein, 26 A.L.R.2d 1219.

Overloading aircraft, liability for personal injury or death based on, 75 A.L.R.2d 868.

Liability of land carrier to passenger who becomes victim of third party’s assault on or about carrier’s vehicle or premises, 34 A.L.R.4th 1054.

Liability of land carrier to passenger who becomes victim of another passenger’s assault, 43 A.L.R.4th 189.

8-08-06.
Vehicles to be disinfected — Misdemeanor. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

8-08-07.
Fare — When payable.

A common carrier may demand the fare of passengers either at starting or at any subsequent time.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1271; R.C. 1895, § 4239; R.C. 1899, § 4239; R.C. 1905, § 5687; C.L. 1913, § 6250; R.C. 1943, § 8-0807.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2187.

8-08-08.
Ejection of passengers.

A passenger who refuses to pay the passenger’s fare or to conform to any lawful regulation of the carrier may be ejected from the vehicle by the carrier. This must be done with as little violence as possible and at any usual stopping place or near some dwelling house. After having ejected the passenger, a carrier has no right to require the payment of any part of that passenger’s fare.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, §§ 1272, 1273; R.C. 1895, § 4240; R.C. 1899, § 4240; R.C. 1905, § 5688; C.L. 1913, § 6251; R.C. 1943, § 8-0808.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2188, 2190.

Collateral References.

Employer’s liability for ejection from vehicle by taxicab or motorbus driver, 53 A.L.R.2d 720, 741.

Sleeping car company’s liability for ejection of passenger by employee, 60 A.L.R.2d 1115.

8-08-09.
Carrier’s lien on luggage.

A common carrier has a lien upon the luggage of a passenger for the payment of such fare as the common carrier is entitled to from that passenger. This lien is regulated by title 35.

Source:

Civ. C. 1877, § 1274; R.C. 1895, § 4241; R.C. 1899, § 4241; R.C. 1905, § 5689; C.L. 1913, § 6252; R.C. 1943, § 8-0809.

Derivation:

Cal. Civ. C., 2191.

8-08-10.
Taxis and buses must be equipped with shatterproof glass. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 673.

8-08-11.
Limitation on actions by common carriers.

A common carrier providing transportation subject to the jurisdiction of the public service commission shall begin a civil action to recover charges for transportation provided by the carrier within three years after the claim accrues.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 149, § 1.